District of Columbia statutes.
47-1274

Interest and penalties.

(a)

(1)

If an ICF-IDD [ICF-IID] fails to pay the full amount of an assessment by the date required by this chapter, or by rules issued pursuant to § 47-1277, the unpaid balance shall accrue interest at the rate of 1.5% per month or any fraction thereof which shall be added to the unpaid balance.

(2)

The Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia may arrange a payment plan for the amount of the assessment and interest in arrears.

(b)

[Repealed].

(c)

(1)

If an ICF-IDD [ICF-IID] that knowingly provides false information in a report required by this chapter, or by rules issued pursuant to § 47-1277, it shall be subject to a penalty of up to $10,000.

(2)

Any action brought to enforce this subsection shall be brought in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia in the name of the District of Columbia.

(d)

The District of Columbia shall have:

(1)

A lien upon the real and personal property located in the District of Columbia of the ICF-IDD [ICF-IID] for any assessments, interest, or administrative penalties that are due under this chapter, or rules issued pursuant to § 47-1277; and

(2)

The priority of a secured creditor.

History

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-68, § 2(b), 53 DCR 47
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 33(b)(7), 59 DCR 5567
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5022(c), 60 DCR 12472

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-1271, § 47-1272, and § 47-1276.

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “ICF-IDD” for “ICF-MR” wherever it appears in the section; and substituted “ICF-IDD’s” for “ICF-MR’s” in (b).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 repealed (b).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5022(d) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5022(d) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 5021 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle C of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Stevie Sellows Intermediate Care Facility Quality Improvement Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.